Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-406 Claims of nonresidents against
insurers domiciled in this State. (a) In a liquidation proceeding begun
in this State against an insurer domiciled in this State, claimants residing in
foreign countries or in states not reciprocal states must file claims in this
State, and claimants residing in reciprocal states may file claims either with
the ancillary receivers, if any, in their respective states, or with the
domiciliary liquidator. Claims must be filed on or before the last date fixed
for the filing of claims in the domiciliary liquidation proceeding.

(b) Claims belonging to claimants residing in
reciprocal states may be proved either in the liquidation proceeding in this
State as provided in this article, or in ancillary proceedings, if any, in the
reciprocal states. If notice of the claims and opportunity to appear and be
heard is afforded the domiciliary liquidator of this State as provided in
section 431:15-407(b) with respect to ancillary proceedings, the final
allowance of claims by the courts in ancillary proceedings in reciprocal states
shall be conclusive as to amount and as to priority against special deposits or
other security located in such ancillary states, but shall not be conclusive
with respect to priorities against general assets under section 431:15-332. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next